District of Columbia statutes.
1-1406

Applicability.

Sections 1-1402 and 1-1403 shall not apply to the Council of the District of Columbia or the Office of the District of Columbia Auditor; provided, that the Council may enter into written agreements with the Office of the Chief Technology Officer to coordinate the operations of its electronic communications.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1816a
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1102, 57 DCR 181
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1102 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1102 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).